District of Columbia statutes.
22-4503.02

Prohibition of firearms from public or private property.

(a)

The District of Columbia may prohibit or restrict the possession of firearms on its property and any property under its control.

(b)

Private persons or entities owning property in the District of Columbia may prohibit or restrict the possession of firearms on their property; provided, that this subsection shall not apply to law enforcement personnel when lawfully authorized to enter onto private property.

July 8, 1932, 47 Stat. 651, ch. 465, § 3b
as added May 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-388, § 2(b), 56 DCR 1162
Section 3 of D.C. Law 17-388 provided: “Sec. 3. Savings clause. Nothing in section 2 shall affect any action, proceeding, or prosecution commenced before September 16, 2008. Any such action, proceeding, or prosecution shall continue, or may be enforced, in the same manner and to the same extent as if the amendments made by that section had not been made.”